Vermont, session 2025-2026, H358.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1222 is amended to read:
§ 1222. INSPECTION OF REGISTERED VEHICLES
* * *
(b)(1)(A) The inspections shall be made at garages or qualified service
stations, designated by the Commissioner as inspection stations, for the
purpose of determining whether those motor vehicles are properly equipped
and maintained in good mechanical condition; provided, however, the.
(B)(i) The scope of the safety inspection of a motor vehicle other
than a school bus or a commercial motor vehicle shall be limited to parts or
VT LEG #381063 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.358
2025 Page 2 of 2
systems that are relevant to the vehicle’s safe operation, and such vehicles shall
not fail the safety portion of the inspection unless the condition of the part or
system poses or may pose a an imminent danger to the operator or to other
highway users.
(ii) If a part or system is not in good mechanical condition but
does not pose an imminent danger to the operator or other highway users, the
inspection station shall provide the owner or operator of the vehicle with
written documentation of the condition of the part or system and recommended
actions that may be taken to restore the part or system to good mechanical
condition. The written documentation shall be signed by the vehicle operator
or owner and a copy shall be kept in the motor vehicle.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381063 v.1